Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-266
Immediate custody of juvenile; when.

If it appears that the juvenile is in such condition or surroundings that his or her welfare requires that his or her custody be immediately assumed by the court, the court may, by endorsement upon the summons provided under section 43-263, order the officer serving it to take the juvenile into custody at once.

Laws 1981, LB 346, § 22.